Washington statutes.
RCW 9.03.010

Abandoning, discarding refrigeration equipment.

Any person who discards or abandons or leaves in any place accessible to children any refrigerator, icebox, or deep freeze locker having a capacity of one and one-half cubic feet or more, which is no longer in use, and which has not had the door removed or a portion of the latch mechanism removed to prevent latching or locking of the door, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1955 c 298 s 1.]